Hawaii statutes.
[§5-12.2] State land mammal.
The ōpe‘ape‘a, otherwise known as the Hawaiian hoary bat (Lasiurus
cinereus semotus), is established and designated as the official land mammal of
the State. [L 2015, c 13, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next